Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1343
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Computer Crimes Act:

(1) Access shall mean to instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve data from, or otherwise use the resources of a computer, computer system, or computer network;

(2) Computer shall mean a high-speed data processing device or system which performs logical, arithmetic, data storage and retrieval, communication, memory, or control functions by the manipulation of signals, including, but not limited to, electronic or magnetic impulses, and shall include any input, output, data storage, processing, or communication facilities directly related to or operating in conjunction with any such device or system;

(3) Computer network shall mean the interconnection of a communications system with a computer through a remote terminal or with two or more interconnected computers or computer systems;

(4) Computer program shall mean an instruction or statement or a series of instructions or statements in a form acceptable to a computer which directs the functioning of a computer system in a manner designed to provide appropriate products from the computer;

(5) Computer security system shall mean a computer program or device that:

(a) Is intended to protect the confidentiality and secrecy of data and information stored in or accessible through the computer system; and

(b) Displays a conspicuous warning to a user that the user is entering a secure system or requires a person seeking access to knowingly respond by use of an authorized code to the program or device in order to gain access;

(6) Computer software shall mean a computer program of procedures or associated documentation concerned with the operation of a computer;

(7) Computer system shall mean related computers and peripheral equipment, whether connected or unconnected;

(8) Data shall mean a representation of information, facts, knowledge, concepts, or instructions prepared in a formalized or other manner and intended for use in a computer or computer network;

(9) Destructive computer program shall mean a computer program that performs a destructive function or produces a destructive product;

(10) Destructive function shall mean a function that (a) degrades the performance of a computer, its associated peripheral equipment, or a computer program, (b) disables a computer, its associated peripheral equipment, or a computer program, or (c) alters a computer program or data;

(11) Destructive product shall mean a product that: (a) Produces unauthorized data, including data that make computer memory space unavailable; (b) results in the unauthorized alteration of data or a computer program; or (c) produces a destructive computer program, including, but not limited to, a self-replicating program;

(12) Loss shall mean the greatest of the following:

(a) The retail market value of the property or services involved;

(b) The reasonable repair or replacement cost whichever is less; or

(c) The reasonable value of the damage created by the unavailability or lack of utility of the property or services involved until repair or replacement can be effected;

(13) Property shall include, but not be limited to, electronically processed or electronically produced data and information in computer software whether in human or computer readable form; and

(14) Services shall include, but not be limited to, computer time, data processing, and storage functions.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 4.

Under the former law, a person was guilty of a Class IIIA felony where a person knowingly solicits, coaxes, entices, or lures (1) a child 16 years of age or younger or (2) a peace officer who is believed by such person to be a child 16 years of age or younger, by means of a computer as that term is defined in this section, to engage in a sexual act. State v. Atchison, 15 Neb. App. 422, 730 N.W.2d 115 (2007).